Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.242

Teacher hiring data—Reports.

By June 15th of each year, a school district shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the number of classroom teachers hired in the previous school year and the district projects will be hired in the following school year, disaggregated by content area.

[ 2016 c 233 s 13.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 2016 c 233 s 13 directed that this section be added to chapter 28A.330 RCW, but codification in chapter 28A.320 RCW appears to be more appropriate.